
Redwood Springs <fund> Operating Agreement
EWM ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENTS SPV, LLC-SERIES 2-UNICORN TECHNOLOGY
RESTATED OPERATING AGREEMENT
THIS RESTATED OPERATING AGREEMENT is made effective this 30th day of June, 2017, as
an amendment of the EWM ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENTS SPV, LLC-SERIES 2-UNICORN
TECHNOLOGY OPERATING AGREEMENT dated January 18, 2017, by and among EWM
ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENTS SPV, LLC (f/k/a EWM ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENTS SPECIAL
PURPOSE VEHICLE, LLC) (“Company”), ENDOWMENT WEALTH MANAGEMENT, INC.
(“Manager”), and the Members of EWM ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENTS SPV, LLC-SERIES 2-
UNICORN TECHNOLOGY (the “Fund”) (for purposes of this Agreement, the members of the Fund being
collectively referred to as the “Members”).
Preamble: The Company was formed under the Delaware Limited Liability Company Act (the “Act”)
as a manager-managed series limited liability company upon the filing of a Certificate of Formation, a copy
of which is attached hereto, together with all amendments, as Exhibit A. The Manager hereby establishes
and designates Fund interests (the “Interests”) and to offer such Interests to certain persons pursuant to the
terms and conditions of that certain Private Placement Memorandum dated January 18, 2017 issued by the
Manager (the “Memorandum”).
Accordingly, in consideration of this preamble (which is a material part of this Agreement) and the
mutual promises hereinafter set forth, the Members, intending to be legally bound, agree as follows:
1. Affirmative Vote. For purposes of this Agreement, an “Affirmative Vote” of the Members shall
mean the affirmative vote of Members holding more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the issued and
outstanding Interests of the Fund.
2. Formation. EWM ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENTS SPECIAL PURPOSE VEHICLE, LLC was
formed as a Delaware Series Limited Liability Company by execution and delivery of the Certificate of
Formation to the Delaware Secretary of State in accordance with and pursuant to the Act. The Company
filed a Certificate of Amendment changing its name on January 17, 2017. The Fund is a designated series
of the Company.
3. Registered office and agent in Delaware. The Company shall maintain a registered office in the
State of Delaware at Corporation Trust Center, 1209 Orange Street, Wilmington, DE 19801 and the name
of the Company’s registered agent in the State of Delaware is The Corporation Trust Company. The
Manager may, from time to time, change the Company’s registered office and/or registered agent and shall
amend whatever documents necessary to reflect such change(s).
4. Registered office and agent in Wisconsin. The Company’s initial registered office in Wisconsin
shall be at the principal office of the Company and the name of its registered agent shall be Robert L. Riedl.
The Manager may, from time to time, change the Company’s registered office and/or registered agent in
Wisconsin and shall amend whatever documents necessary to reflect such change.
5. Designation of Series. EWM ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENTS SPV, LLC-SERIES 2-
UNICORN TECHNOLOGY is hereby designated for the purpose of establishing a fund through which the
assets of the Fund may, in the discretion of the Manager, be invested in shares of stock (the “Portfolio
Company Securities”) in unicorn investments and other late-stage technology startup companies (the
“Portfolio Company(ies)”). In furtherance of the foregoing, the Fund may engage in any lawful act or
activity for which limited liability companies may be formed under the Act, and any and all activities
necessary or incidental thereto, including any other business activities described in the Memorandum.
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 1 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 2
6. Intent. The Members intend that the Fund shall always be operated in a manner consistent with its
treatment as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, and that the Company or the Fund not be
operated or treated as a partnership for any other purposes. No Member or Manager shall take any action
inconsistent with the intent of the parties set forth in this Section.
7. Term. The term of the Fund shall commence on the effective date of this Agreement and, subject
to the provisions of Section 15, the Fund shall have a perpetual life.
8. Fund Membership.
8.1. Capital Contribution. Each Member of the Fund shall contribute, in accordance with this
Agreement, the total capital commitment as is set forth on the signature page of the subscription agreement
of such Member (the “Subscription Agreement”) that is accepted by the Manager (the “Total Capital
Commitment”).
8.2 Initial Capital Contribution. Each Member shall contribute its initial capital contribution
to the Fund, pro rata in accordance with its respective Total Capital Commitment, when called by the
Manager as necessary to fund the Fund’s first investment, Fund expenses, and other obligations of the Fund
(the “Initial Capital Contribution”). The Initial Capital Contribution shall be made by the Member not
later than four (4) business days following delivery of a Capital Call Notice. The Initial Capital
Contribution shall be evidenced by a percentage interest (“Interest”) in the Fund. Interests shall not be
certificated. Each Interest shall represent a proportionate interest in the Fund equal to other Interests issued
and outstanding.
8.3 Qualifications. Ownership is not open to the general public, and is limited to investors
meeting qualifications as set forth herein. Each Member shall, in connection with execution of the
Subscription Agreement, execute and deliver a signature page by which such party irrevocably agrees to be
bound by the terms of this Agreement. The Manager may accept additional subscriptions as deemed
appropriate by Manager. The Manager shall maintain in the Company records a current list of the Fund
Members, which shall be updated by the Manager from time to time to reflect the admission of new
Members or additional capital contribution of Members. Members must be “accredited investors” as that
term is defined in Rule 501 of Regulation D as promulgated under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended
and “qualified clients”, as defined in Rule 205-3 as promulgated under the Investment Advisers Act of
1940, as amended.
8.4 Capital Calls. Capital contributions following the Initial Capital Contribution shall be
made by the Members, pro rata, in accordance with its respective Total Capital Commitment, when called
by the Manager as needed to fund investments, Fund expenses, and other obligations of the Fund, pursuant
to a written call notice to each Member (each, a “Capital Call Notice”). A Capital Call Notice shall be
given to the Members not less than ten (10) days prior to the date on which such additional capital
contribution is to be made; provided, however, that a Capital Call Notice for the Initial Capital Contribution
shall be given in accordance with Section 8.2. Each Member shall remit to the Fund the amount specified
in the Capital Call Notice on or before the due date specified therein.
8.5 Capital Call in Excess of Commitment. If the Manager determines that additional capital
is required, the Manager shall determine the amount of such additional capital and the anticipated time such
additional capital will be required, and whether such additional capital shall be provided by the Members
by way of additional capital contributions (an “Additional Capital Call”) or by way of loans from Members.
Following the Additional Capital Call, the Manager shall specify in a written notice to each member the
amount to be contributed pursuant to the Additional Capital Call, based upon the Interests owned by such
Member. Provided, however, that no Member will be required to fund amounts in excess of its total
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 2 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 3
Commitment. Interests of Members shall be readjusted in the event additional capital contributions made
and any non-contributing Members shall be subject to dilution of its interest in the Company.
8.6 Limitation of Liability. No Member shall be liable for the debts, obligations, and liabilities
of the Company except as expressly provided by the Act.
8.7 Capital Accounts. There shall be established with respect to each Member a separate
capital account (the “Capital Account”). Capital Accounts shall be maintained in accordance with Federal
tax law and with the provisions of Section 12 of this Agreement.
8.8 Additional Fund Members. From the date of formation of the Company, the Manager may
accept capital commitments from Members (an “Increasing Member”) and/or other persons or entities
acceptable to Manager to be admitted to the Company as additional Members (each, an “Additional
Member”, and collectively with Increasing Members, the “Additional Commitment Members”). Any such
additional capital commitments shall be accepted and any Additional Commitment Member shall be
admitted to the Company with respect to its additional capital commitment if such Additional Commitment
Member makes, with respect to his, her, or its new or additional capital commitment, a capital contribution
which would result in the Additional Commitment Member having contributed to the capital of the Fund
the same percentage of its Capital Commitment as the Members who are not Additional Commitment
Members as of the applicable closing date (the “Pre-Existing Members”) have contributed. Such capital
contributions shall be equitably adjusted to take into account the aggregate distributions, if any, received
by the Pre-Existing Members prior to the date on which the new or additional capital commitment of the
Additional Commitment Member is made; and
Each person, who is admitted as an Additional Member or a Substitute Member, shall
become a party to this Agreement by executing a counterpart signature page to this Agreement. The
admission of an Additional Member shall be effective upon the execution of the necessary signature page
to this Agreement and shall not require the consent or approval of any Member. Capital accounts of each
Additional Commitment Member shall be adjusted by an amount to reflect such Member’s pro rata share
of all Fund expends as if such Additional Commitment Member had been a Member from the initial Closing
Date. The Manager may, at its option, at the time a Fund Member is admitted, close the Fund’s books (as
though the Fund’s tax year has ended) or make pro rata allocations of loss, income, and expense deductions
to a new Fund Member for that portion of the Fund’s tax year in which the Fund Member was admitted in
accordance with the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and Treasury Regulations promulgated
thereunder.
8.9 Actions by Members.
8.9.1 Meetings. Neither the Manager for the Fund shall have any obligation to have any
meetings of the Fund Members, except as required by the Act.
8.9.2 Proxy. To the extent permitted by law and not inconsistent with the provisions of
this Agreement granting Members the right to vote with regard to a matter, Manager will exercise proxy
voting authority on behalf of the Fund. In exercising its proxy voting authority, Manager will vote in a
manner which it believes to be in the best interest of the Fund.
9. Management by Manager.
9.1. Authority of Manager. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this Agreement or by
applicable law, the Fund shall be managed by the Manager. The Manager shall have full, exclusive, and
complete discretion in the management and control of the business and affairs of the Company and the
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 3 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 4
Fund and shall make all decisions affecting the Company’s business and affairs, and any action taken by
the Manager (in its capacity as such) shall constitute the act of and serve to bind the Company and the
Fund. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this Agreement, the Members shall not participate in
the management of the Fund, and no Member shall have the authority to act on behalf of the Fund.
9.2 Appointment. The Members hereby appoint Endowment Wealth Management, Inc. to
serve as the Manager (“Manager”) of the Company and the Fund. The rights and responsibilities of the
Manager may be further defined by a written Management Agreement in the form attached hereto as Exhibit
B (the “Management Agreement”). The Manager shall be entitled to the fees, compensation, expense
reimbursements, and allocations set forth herein.
9.3 Specific Powers. Without limiting the provisions of the foregoing and except as expressly
provided by this Agreement or by law, the Manager is hereby granted the right, power and authority to do
on behalf of the Company and the Fund all things which, in its best business judgment are necessary, proper
or desirable to carry out its duties and responsibilities, including, but not limited to the right, power and
authority to:
9.3.1. Invest the assets of the Fund in such a manner as determined appropriate
by Manager, which shall include, but not be limited to, purchase of an interest in the Partnership, as defined
herein;
9.3.2. Incur all expenditures and pay all obligations of the Fund;
9.3.3. Act on behalf of the Fund in all respects in connection with the Fund’s
assets, including the hedging of currencies and sale, exchange, transfer, disposition, lease, financing, or
refinancing of all or any portion of the Fund’s assets;
9.3.4. Cause the Fund to borrow money from banks and other lending institutions
or any other Person for Fund purposes, pledge or mortgage any or all of the assets of the Fund and the
income therefrom to secure or provide for the repayment of such loans, obtain replacements of any such
loan in whole or in part, and refinance, recast, modify, extend, or consolidate any loan;
9.3.5. Procure and maintain at the expense of the Fund, such insurance in such
amounts and covering such risks as are appropriate in the judgment of the Manager;
9.3.6. Establish cash reserves for working capital, accrued or future expenses,
including management fees, or any other Fund purpose;
9.3.7. In accordance herewith, determine the amount of any cash or property to
be distributed to the Members, set the dates for distributions to the Members and cause the Fund to distribute
cash or property in accordance with this Agreement;
9.3.8. Supervise the preparation and filing of all Fund tax returns;
9.3.9. Coordinate all accounting and clerical functions of the Fund;
9.3.10. Make interim investments of Fund assets, including investments in money
market funds, bank certificates of deposit, government obligations and mutual funds;
9.3.11. Issue Interests as contemplated by this Agreement or the Confidential Private
Placement Memorandum of even date herewith;
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 4 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 5
9.3.12. Open and maintain bank accounts on behalf of the Fund;
9.3.13. Compromise or settle any claim against or inuring to the benefit of the Fund;
9.3.14. Commence any legal action or other proceeding of any kind;
9.3.15. Execute and deliver any and all documents or instruments of any kind which
the Manager may deem necessary or appropriate for the carrying out of the purposes of the Fund;
9.3.16. Amend this Agreement and the Certificate of Formation in accordance
with Section 21.9; and
9.3.17 Perform any and all other acts or activities customary or incident to the
purposes of the Fund.
9.4 Method of appointing new managers after Initial Manager. All managers after the initial
Manager shall be appointed by Affirmative Vote of the Members.
9.5. Manager's term. The term of the Manager shall be indefinite, unless terminated in
accordance with the Management Agreement.
9.6 Limitation of Manager’s liability. No Manager shall be liable, responsible or accountable
in damages or otherwise to the Members for any act or omission pursuant to the authority granted to the
Manager by this Operating Agreement if the Manager acted in good faith and in a manner he or she
reasonably believed to be within the scope of the authority granted to him by this Agreement and in the best
interests or not opposed to the best interests of the Fund, provided that the Manager shall not be relieved of
liability in respect of any claim, issue or matter as to which the Manager shall have been finally adjudicated
to have violated any statutory fiduciary duty. Subject to this limitation in the case of any such judgment of
liability, the Fund shall indemnify the Manager to the fullest extent permitted by law.
9.7 Duty of Manager to inform Members. The Manager shall use reasonable efforts to inform
the Members on a current basis concerning the internal affairs of the Fund and the condition of its
business. Specifically, the Manager shall provide the Members with quarterly investment statements, and
shall also distribute annual financial and other information provided by the Partnership. The Manager shall
provide K-1s to Members as promptly as possible following receipt of the K-1 from the Partnership for the
previous year.
9.8 Absolute Restriction on Manager Action. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
Agreement to the contrary, the Manager shall have no authority to do any of the following:
9.8.1 Do any act that is in contravention of applicable law;
9.8.2 Possess Fund property or assign rights in specific Fund property, for other than a
Fund purpose;
9.8.3 Borrow funds from the Fund or commingle Fund funds or assets with the funds or
assets of the Manager; or
9.8.4 Perform any act that would subject the Members to liability in any jurisdiction
except as expressly provided in this Operating Agreement.
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 5 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 6
9.9 Employment of Affiliates. The Fund may engage any Member or affiliate of a Member, to
render services or goods to the Fund, provided that the fees or other amounts payable for such services or
goods are comparable to those prevailing in arms’ length transactions for similar goods or services. The
Manager(s) shall not be required to manage the Fund as its sole and exclusive function. Additionally, the
Members may have other business interests and may engage in other activities in addition to those relating
to the Fund, and neither the Fund nor any Member shall have any right, by virtue of this Agreement, to
share or participate in such other investments or activities of one another.
9.10 Indemnification.
9.10.1 Liability of Manager. No Manager shall be liable to the Fund for any loss or
damage suffered by the Fund on account of any action taken or omitted to be taken by the Person serving
as Manager, that the person in good faith believed to be in or not opposed to the Fund’s best interests, and
with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, that the person had no reasonable cause to believe was
unlawful. In addition, the Manager shall not be liable to the Fund for any loss or damage suffered by the
Fund on account of any action taken or omitted to be taken in reliance upon advice of counsel for the Fund
or upon statements made or information furnished by Owners of the Fund that the Manager had reasonable
grounds to believe to be true. The foregoing shall not be exclusive of other rights and defenses to which the
Manager may be entitled as a matter of law.
9.10.2 Successful defense. The Fund shall indemnify a person serving as a Manager to
the extent the person has been successful on the merits or otherwise in the defense of a claim, action, dispute,
or issue such that the person has no liability for all expenses incurred in connection with the claim, action,
dispute or issue, if the Person was a party due to the person’s role as Manager. Indemnification under this
subsection shall be made within ten (10) days of receipt by the Fund of written demand for indemnification.
9.10.3 Other Cases. In all other cases, the Fund shall indemnify the Manager against
liability and expenses incurred by the Manager in connection with a claim, action, dispute or issue, if the
person was a party due to the person’s role as Manager, unless it shall have been concluded that the person
breached or failed to perform a duty owed to the Fund, which breach or failure constitutes: (a) a willful
failure to deal fairly with the Fund in connection with a matter in which the person has a material conflict
of interest; (b) a violation of criminal law, unless the Manager had reasonable cause to believe its conduct
was lawful or no reasonable cause to believe the conduct was unlawful; (c) a transaction from which the
Manager derived an improper personal profit (which shall expressly exclude related party transactions
disclosed to the Owners); or (d) willful misconduct.
10. Designated Series. In accordance with Section 18-218 of the Act, the Fund shall constitute a
designated series (“Designated Series”) of the Company, having its separate assets base composition,
business purpose and/or investment objective, and the Members hereof shall have separate rights, powers
or duties with respect to specified property or obligations or profits and losses associated with specified
property or obligations.
10.1 To the fullest extent consistent with the Act, other applicable law, and this Operating
Agreement, this Designated Series shall be treated as a separate limited liability company. The provisions
of this Operating Agreement shall apply, as may be appropriate in the context of each provision and
situation, (i) to this Designated Series individually.
10.2 The Manager may establish additional classes or groups of managers or members having
specific relative rights, powers and duties with respect to this Designated Series, including rights, powers,
and duties senior to existing classes and groups of managers or members associated with the series.
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 6 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 7
10.3 The Manager shall separately hold and account for the assets and obligations of this
Designated Series, without commingling. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, different Designated
Series may co-invest together in properties or assets, on a fractional basis or in any other manner consistent
with the documents establishing each such Designated Series.
10.4 The Manager shall maintain separate and distinct records for this individual Designated
Series as if such Designated Series were a separate Company.
10.5 To the fullest extent allowed under law, (i) the debts, liabilities, and obligations incurred,
contracted for, or otherwise existing with respect to a particular Designated Series shall be enforceable only
against the assets of such Designated Series and not against the assets of the Company generally, and (ii) a
member's or assignee's liability for the losses and liabilities of a Designated Series shall be limited to such
member's or assignee's interest in that particular Designated Series, including such member's or Assignee's
undistributed Capital Contribution and share of any undistributed net Profits with respect to such
Designated Series.
10.6 The establishment of another Designated Series will have no effect on the terms of this
Agreement and shall be set forth in a separate document or addendum.
10.7 A member ceases to be a member with respect to this Designated Series upon assignment
or other transfer of all of the member's interest in this Designated Series.
10.8 This Designated Series may be dissolved or terminated under the procedures set forth in
Section 15 without causing the dissolution of the Company or of any of its other Designated Series.
10.9 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Manager shall have the authority to allocate and
apportion common costs and expenses of the Company to each Designated Series in such proportions as
the Manager determines in its sole and reasonable discretion.
11. Management Fees. In consideration of identifying, organizing, and managing the Fund
investments and for performance by Manager of the duties enumerated herein, the Fund shall pay to
Manager the following fees:
11.1 First Year Management Fee. Commencing upon the initial funding date, the Fund shall
pay a management fee (“First Year Management Fee”) equal to two percent (2%) of total Capital
Contributions of Members, with a quarter of two percent (.25 * 2.0%) payable in advance on the first day
of each calendar quarter (provided that a pro-rated portion of the fee shall be payable on the initial funding
date if not the first day of a calendar quarter). The initial funding date shall be defined as the earlier of the
date that the Manager initiates transfer of Funds to the entity or entities from which it is acquiring the
Portfolio Securities(if investor funds are aggregated in an Escrow Account) or the date upon which Member
monies are received by the Fund (to Fund checking account or other account held in the name of the Fund).
11.2 Ongoing Management Fee. Thereafter, the Fund shall pay an annual management fee (the
“Management Fee”) equal to one percent (1.0%) of the net asset value of the Fund, with a quarter of a
percent (.25 * 1.0%) payable in advance on the first day of each calendar quarter. For purposes of this
Agreement, Manager shall determine the fair value of non-publicly traded assets according to its thencurrent Valuation Policy, a copy of which has been provided to Members as Exhibit C of the Operating
Agreement. The Valuation Policy may be amended from time to time at the discretion of Manager.
Alternatively, the Manager, in its own discretion, may choose to retain the services of an independent, thirdparty evaluation service, at Fund expense, to assist in efforts to value Portfolio Company Securities. If
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 7 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 8
Portfolio Company Securities are publicly traded or the Fund holds other publicly traded securities, the
valuation method shall be based upon the closing share price of such securities on the primary listed
exchange on the last day of the immediately preceding calendar quarter.
11.3 Carried Interest. At all times from and after the date of this Agreement, Manager shall
receive ten percent (10%) of Profits (the “Carried Interest”). “Profits” shall mean all distributions in excess
of Member Capital Contributions.” For purposes of valuing the Carried Interest, if Portfolio Company
Securities are publicly traded or the Fund holds other publicly traded securities, the valuation method shall
be based upon the average of the closing share price of such securities on the primary listed exchange for
the previous twenty (20) trading sessions.
11.4 Capital Calls for Management Fees. The Manager shall be permitted to make capital calls
for management fees and/or future corporate expenses. The Manager shall not be financially responsible
for any Company expenses, all of which shall be paid by the Company.
12. Allocations of profits and losses.
12.1 Allocation of profits and losses. Except as provided in this Section, items of income, gain,
loss, or deduction of the Company shall be allocated among the Members pro rata in proportion to Interests
held. Such items shall be determined on a daily, monthly or other basis, as determined by the Company’s
Manager using any permissible method under Section 706 of the Internal Revenue Code and the Treasury
Regulations thereunder.
12.2 Tax allocations. All matters concerning the allocation of profits, gains, and losses among
the parties (including taxes thereon) and accounting procedures not expressly provided for by the terms of
this Agreement shall be determined by the Manager in its sole and absolute discretion in consultation with
the accountants for the Fund and the Company, and the Manager is expressly permitted to use any
permissible method of apportioning gain and loss and the Manager’s determination of the foregoing matters
shall be final and conclusive as to all parties.
12.3 Loans to Fund. Nothing in this Operating Agreement shall prevent any Fund Member from
making secured or unsecured loans to the Fund by agreement of the Fund and the Manager.
12.4 Taxation. It is the intention of the Fund Members that the Fund be subject to taxation as a
partnership for federal income tax purposes and that each series shall file a separate tax return and be treated
as a separate company for tax purposes. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Manager may, upon the
recommendation of its accountants, file a single tax return for the Company.
12.5 Returns and other elections. The Manager shall cause the preparation and timely filing of
all tax returns required to be filed by the Fund. Copies of such returns, or pertinent information therefrom,
shall be furnished to the Members within a reasonable time after the end of the Company’s fiscal year. All
elections permitted to be made by the Fund under federal or state laws shall be made by the Manager in its
sole discretion.
12.6 Tax Matters Member. Manager is hereby designated as the “Tax Matters Member” and is
authorized and required to represent the Fund and the Company, as the case may be (at the Fund’s expense,
pro rata in the case of the Company) in connection with all examinations of the Fund’s affairs by tax
authorities. The Members agree to cooperate with each other and to do or refrain from doing any and all
things reasonably required to conduct such proceedings.
13. Interim Distributions.
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 8 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 9
13.1 Order of Distributions. The Fund may or may not make an interim distributions upon a
Liquidity Event (as defined herein) with respect to a Portfolio Company. Interim distributions, if any, shall
be made at such times as the Manager may determine in its sole discretion. Interim distributions shall be
made as follows:
13.1.1 First, to payment of Management Fees set forth in Section 11;
13.1.2 Second, to payment of any outstanding debts or obligations of the Fund, if any,
and to Members who have made loans to the Fund;
13.1.3 Third, to the Members pro rata in proportion to Interests, until each such Member’s
capital contributions have been returned; and
13.1.4 Fourth, after Members have recouped all Capital Contributions, the Carried
Interest of the remainder to the Manager and the remainder to Members, pro rata in proportion to Interests.
13.2 Limitations on Distributions. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained
in this Agreement, the Company shall not make a distribution to any Member in respect of such Member’s
Membership of Interests if (a) such distribution would violate the Act or other applicable law; (b) to the
extent prohibited by any financing agreement with any lender to the Company, or (c) which would render
the Company insolvent.
13.3 Withholding. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Company shall
comply with any withholding requirements under any law and shall remit amounts withheld to and file
required forms with applicable taxing authorities. To the extent that the company is required to withhold
and pay over any amounts to any taxing authorities with respect to distributions or allocations to any
Member, the amount withheld shall be treated as a distribution of cash to such Member in the amount of
such withholding.
13.4 Liquidity Event Defined. For purposes of this Agreement, a “Liquidity Event” as to a
respective Portfolio Company means the receipt by the Fund of a material amount of cash or non-cash
assets, including publicly traded securities, in respect of the applicable Portfolio Company Securities held
by the Fund. A Liquidity Event for a respective Portfolio Company shall be deemed to occur upon the
earliest of (a) the effectiveness of a registration statement filed by the Portfolio Company with the SEC on
Form S-1 with respect to shares of such Portfolio Company held by the Fund, after any applicable lock-up
period; (b) a Merger Event (as defined in the Memorandum); (c) the bankruptcy, liquidation or dissolution
of the Portfolio Company; or (d) upon the Manager, in its discretion, determining the Portfolio Company
Securities are freely transferrable, each as of the date that such consideration is received or such
determination or transferability is made.
13.5 Form of Distribution. Distributions (under this Section and Section 14) may be comprised of (i)
Portfolio Company Securities; and/or (ii) cash or other freely transferrable securities to the extent that, in
connection with a Liquidity Event, the Fund receives cash or other securities in exchange for the Portfolio
Company Securities. In connection with the distribution of securities, the Members agree to execute and
deliver such other documents and instruments as are reasonably requested by the Manager in order to ensure
compliance with the applicable securities laws and contractual obligations that apply to the Fund.
14. Distributions upon Dissolution.
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 9 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 10
14.1 Upon the occurrence of a Dissolution, the Manager shall, subject to its ability to establish
permitted reserves, effect final distribution as soon as is commercially practicable following such event, in
the following manner:
14.1.1. First, to payment of Management Fees set forth in Section 11;
14.1.2. Second, to payment of any outstanding debts or obligations of the Fund, if
any (including all expenses of the Fund incident to the liquidation and establishment of Reserves) and to
Members who have made loans to the Fund;
14.1.3. Third, to the Members pro rata in proportion to Interests, until each such
Member’s capital contributions have been returned; and
14.1.4. Fourth, after Members have recouped all Capital Contributions, the Carried
Interest of the remainder to the Manager and the remainder to Members, pro rata in proportion to Interests.
15. Dissolution; Withdrawal.
15.1 Dissolution. The Fund shall be dissolved upon the occurrence of any of the following
events: (i) the end of the term established for the Fund, if any; (ii) a Liquidity Event has been incurred by
all Portfolio Company Securities owned by the Fund; (iii) at the option of the Manager at any time; or (iv)
entry of a decree of judicial dissolution by a court of competent jurisdiction, pursuant to the Act. The
Company shall be dissolved upon the occurrence of any of the following events: (i) at the option of the
Manager at any time; (ii) upon the termination or dissolution of all Designated Series; or (iii) entry of a
decree of judicial dissolution by a court of competent jurisdiction.
15.2 Withdrawal. A Member shall not take any voluntary action to withdraw from the Fund.
Unless otherwise approved by the Manager, a Fund Member who attempts to withdraw from the Fund shall
not be entitled to a distribution in redemption of such Member’s interest; rather, such Member shall have
the interest of an assignee of said Interest, in accordance with Section 16. A Member whose interest is
terminated as a result of a Withdrawal Event shall have the status of an assignee pursuant to the provisions
of Section 16. A “Withdrawal Event” shall mean any action by a Member such as death, retirement,
resignation, expulsion, bankruptcy, or dissociation which terminates the continued Membership of a
Member in the Fund.
16. Transfer of interests in the Company.
16.1. No right to transfer. Except for transfers by will or intestate succession or by operation of
law, no Fund Member may offer, sell, transfer, assign, or otherwise dispose of or encumber (hereinafter, a
“Transfer”), in whole or in part, such Member’s Interest without the consent of the Manager, which may
be given or withheld in the sole and absolute discretion of the Manager.
16.2 Subject to the provisions of this Article, an assignee of an Interest of a Fund Member shall
be deemed admitted as a substitute Member (a “Substitute Member”) only upon the satisfactory completion
of the following:
16.2.1 consent of the Manager shall have been given, which consent shall be evidenced
by a written consent executed by the Manager;
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 10 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 11
16.2.2 the assignee shall have accepted and agreed to be bound by the terms and
provisions of this Agreement (as amended) by executing a counterpart hereof and such assignee shall have
expressly assumed all obligations of the assignor Member hereunder, and shall have executed such other
documents and instruments as the Manager may require in its sole discretion;
16.2.3 the assignee shall have complied with all governmental rules and regulations, if
any;
16.2.4 the assignee meets the suitability requirements for investing in the Fund and the
assignee completes a subscription agreement providing the Manager with appropriate representations and
warranties; and
16.2.5 all costs and expenses incurred by the Fund and Manager in connection with this
Section shall be paid by the person or entity seeking to become a Substitute Member.
16.3 Rights of Assignee of Interest.
16.3.1 Subject to the provisions of this Section and except as required by operation of
law, the Fund shall not be obligated for any purposes whatsoever to recognize the assignment by any
Member of such Member’s interest until the Fund has received notice thereof.
16.3.2 Any person or entity who is the assignee of all or a portion of the Interest of a
Member but who has not become a substitute Member, and desires to make further disposition of such
Interest, shall be subject to all of the provisions of this Section to the same extent and in the same manner
as any Member desiring to transfer an Interest in the Fund.
16.4 Effective of Bankruptcy, Death or Incompetence. The death of a Member or the
adjudication of a Member as incompetent shall not cause the termination or dissolution of the Fund and the
business of the Fund shall continue. If a Member dies, such Member’s executor, administrator or trustee,
or if such Member becomes incompetent, such Member’s committee, guardian or conservator, shall have
the rights of such Member for the purposes of settling or managing such Member’s estate or property and
such power as the Member possessed to dispose of all or any part of such Member’s interest and to join
with any assignee in satisfying conditions precedent to the admission of the assignee as a Substitute
Member.
16.5 Attachment by Creditors. If an Interest is subject to attachment by a creditor or is assigned
for the benefit of any creditor, the Interest obtained by such creditor shall be only that of an assignee and
in no event shall such creditor have the rights of a Substitute Member.
16.6 Assignee. If a Member transfers all or a portion of the Member’s interest, involuntarily,
by operation of law, or voluntarily, without the consent required by this Section, the transferee or assignee
shall (i) only be entitled to receive that portion of profit and loss, and any distribution of Fund assets,
attributable to the Interest acquired by reason of such disposition from and after the effective date of such
disposition and only upon written notification of the same to Manager, and (ii) have no other rights as a
Member unless admitted as a Substitute Member in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
16.7 Absolute restriction. In the case of any proposed transfer, no transfer of Interests may be made
if, in the opinion of the Fund’s legal counsel, the transfer or assignment will violate any applicable federal or
state securities laws. Before making any transfer of Interests, the party proposing to make the transfer must
notify the Fund in writing and the Manager shall, if the Manager believes there is a material risk of violating
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 11 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 12
this section, obtain from the Fund’s legal counsel confirming whether the proposed transfer will cause a
violation of securities laws. Legal fees shall be the responsibility of the proposed transferor.
17. Confidentiality. Except as contemplated by this Agreement, each Member shall keep confidential
and not disclose to other persons which are not Members, any information or materials which (1) pertain to
this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated hereby or the business of the Fund; or (2) pertain
to confidential or proprietary information of any other Member or of the Fund (“Confidential
Information”). The obligations of confidentiality contained herein shall survive the termination of this
Agreement.
18. Books of account and fiscal year.
18.1. Books of account. The Fund shall keep complete and accurate records and accounts
necessary or convenient to record the Fund’s business and affairs and sufficient to record the determination
and allocation of all items of income, gain, loss, deduction and credit, distributions and other amounts as
may be provided for herein, including records and accounts of all Fund revenues and expenditures and of
the acquisition, Membership and disposition of all Fund assets.
18.2. Fiscal year. The fiscal year of the Fund shall end on the 31st day of December of each year
(the “Fiscal Year”).
19. Bank. The Fund is authorized to bank at and borrow from such bank(s) or other financial
institution(s) as a Manager shall determine from time to time or at any time, and the manager is authorized
to execute and deliver to said bank(s) or other financial institution(s) such depository and/or borrowing
resolutions as may be necessary or appropriate for the Fund to bank at and/or borrow from said bank(s) or
other financial institution(s).
20. Protection of limited liability. A Manager shall use his or her best efforts to protect the limited liability
of each Member and Manager, including, without limitation, by:
20.1. ensuring that the abbreviation “LLC” appears after the name of the Fund in all Fund
contracts, stationery, checks, business cards, purchase orders, invoices, advertisements and other media
containing the name of the Fund and likely to be read, seen or heard by third parties;
20.2. ensuring that the books and accounts of the Fund are maintained separately from those of
any Member and that there is no commingling of the assets of the Fund with those of any Member;
20.3. ensuring that the Fund’s cash and other assets, cash flow, insurance, and other financial
resources are sufficient to enable it to meet its reasonably foreseeable liabilities when due; and
20.4. ensuring that when signing any agreement or other document on behalf of the Fund or when
dealing with third parties on behalf of the Fund, the Manager identify himself or herself as manager and
identify the Fund as the party on whose behalf he or she acts.
21. Miscellaneous.
21.1. Choice of Law. This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with the internal laws of
the State of Delaware, without application of its conflicts of law principles.
21.2. Severability. If any provision of this Agreement shall be unenforceable under the laws of
Delaware or any other applicable law, at the present time or in the future, such unenforceability shall not
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 12 of 25
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement page 13
affect the enforceability of the remaining provisions of this Agreement. This Agreement shall be deemed
to be modified and amended so as to be in compliance with applicable law, and this Agreement shall then
be construed so as to best serve the intention of the parties at the time of the execution of this Agreement.
21.3. Captions. The captions in this Agreement are inserted only as a matter of convenience and
in no way affect the terms or intent of any provisions of this Agreement.
21.4. Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in one (1) or more counterparts, each of
which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one (1) and the same instrument.
The counterparts of this Agreement may be executed and delivered by electronic signature, symbol or other
electronic process executed or completed by a party to this Agreement, and the same shall be binding upon
the parties as if an original had been received.
21.5. Binding Effect. Except as provided to the contrary herein, the terms and provisions of this
Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the Members and their respective
successors and permitted assigns, spouses, heirs and legal representatives, as applicable.
21.6. Entire Agreement. This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between or among the
Members regarding its subject matter as of the date hereof, and supersedes all prior agreements, statements,
understandings, and representations of the Members with respect thereto.
21.7. Rights of creditors. The provisions of this Agreement are not intended to be for the benefit
of any person (other than a Member) to whom any debts, liabilities, or obligations are owed by, or who
otherwise has a claim against, the Fund or a Member, and no such person shall have any rights under such
provisions or shall by reason of such provisions make any claim in respect of any such debts, liabilities, or
obligations against the Fund or a Member.
21.8. Interpretation. When the context in which the words are used in this Agreement indicates
that such is the intent, words in the singular shall include the plural, and vice versa, and pronouns in any
gender shall refer to and include all genders.
21.9 Amendment. This Operating Agreement may not be amended except in writing by the
Manager and with the affirmative vote of the Members. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Manager may
make certain clerical, typographical, or other amendments to clarify any ambiguity or to make this
Agreement consistent with any applicable law, without the consent of the Members, provided that no such
change shall materially or adversely affect the economic rights or interest of such Members.
22. Acknowledgment of attorney representation. Each of the Members acknowledges that Epiphany
Law, LLC has acted as attorneys for the Fund in connection with the negotiation and execution of this
Agreement; that each of the other Members has been advised to seek independent representation by counsel
of his or her own choice; and that each of the Members is not relying upon Epiphany Law, LLC to act as
his or her attorneys in connection with any matter relating to this Agreement.
[Signature page to follow.]
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 13 of 25
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 14 of 25
EXHIBIT A
CERTIFICATE OF FORMATION
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 15 of 25
Delaware
The First State
Page 1
6249739 8100 Authentication: 203518805
SR# 20167085318 Date: 12-15-16
You may verify this certificate online at corp.delaware.gov/authver.shtml
I, JEFFREY W. BULLOCK, SECRETARY OF STATE OF THE STATE OF
DELAWARE, DO HEREBY CERTIFY THE ATTACHED IS A TRUE AND CORRECT
COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE OF FORMATION OF “EWM ALTERNATIVE
INVESTMENTS SPECIAL PURPOSE VEHICLE, LLC”, FILED IN THIS OFFICE
ON THE FOURTEENTH DAY OF DECEMBER, A.D. 2016, AT 5:31 O`CLOCK
P.M.
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 16 of 25
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 17 of 25
EXHIBIT B
MANAGEMENT AGREEMENT
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 18 of 25
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 19 of 25
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 20 of 25
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 21 of 25
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 22 of 25
EXHIBIT C
MANAGER VALUATION POLICY
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 23 of 25
Dec 19, 2016
ENDOWMENT WEALTH MANAGEMENT
PRIVATE INVESTMENTS VALUATION POLICY
Endowment Wealth Management (“EWM”) will value private investments periodically, including as of
December 31 of each calendar year, and ideally, as of each quarterly reporting period. Investments will
be stated at fair value as determined by (a) the third party Investment Manager of the Co-investment or
Private Fund Manager of the investment , or (b) for investments without an outside manager or are
otherwise directly managed or advised by EWM, Investments will be stated at fair value as identified by
EWM subject to the following Guidelines:
EWM seeks to have all investments in Portfolio Companies reported at fair value on a consistent,
transparent, and prudent basis.
EWM evaluates and prices securities quarterly using three general classifications:
1) Cost/cost adjusted
2) Zero, if company is bankrupt and has minimal probability of recovery
3) Impaired, if company is raising dilutive rounds of financing and/or missing its financial targets
Cost/Cost Adjusted
This valuation at cost method will remain in effect, subject to change only for verifiable purchase or sale
events. Investments will remain valued at cost (plus accrued interest, unless circumstances support a
different valuation or another valuation method). The following methods may be applied to each
investment:
 Changes in valuation will generally be made when a subsequent financing is completed at a
different valuation that present a clearly verifiable data driven event. In this case, fair value will
be set to the value at which the new round of financing has taken place.
 Adjustments to the value of the round should be considered if the transaction is between related
parties, is done under duress, is done with a strategic buyer at an arbitrary price, or there has been
a change in market conditions that do not support the new price.
 Adjustment in valuation may be made if there has been significant economic, corporate or
operating events affecting the Portfolio Company that in EWM’s opinion, have a material impact
on the Portfolio Company’s prospects and therefore its fair value. Such event could include the
realization of government approvals/dissapprovals for projects, announcements in new or lost
contract agreements, management changes or other events likely to have a positive or negative
impact on the Portfolio Company’s prospects. Such adjustment will be based on EWM’s
judgement and any value estimated may not be realized or realizable.
 Adjustments in valuation may be made based upon financial information received from the
Portfolio Company.
 Consideration may be given to Third Party Valuations.
 Consideration to a revaluation may be given when changes in conditions with or without a new
financing round may occur. These conditions may involve:
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 24 of 25
Dec 19, 2016
o Changes in performance or the long-term financial prospects of the Portfolio Company or
of the individual class of security or credit instrument
o Market changes affecting the Portfolio Company, industry or financial markets
 Consideration given to estimated Portfolio Company value based on market value of similar
companies currently trading in the financial markets.
 Consideration given to circumstances when an individual security’s cost no longer represents the
value effectively, such as when the most recent round has effectively changed the distribution
rights of the previous investments through preference provisions or when a restructuring has
occurred.
 Consideration given to liquidation value, which takes into account the advantages that may accrue
to various preferred shareholders over other shareholders when the liquidation proceeds are
shared.
 Consideration given to revenue-producing companies can include performance multiples and/or
industry valuation benchmarks, etc.
Bankruptcy
Bankruptcy reflects the complete write-off of the security as the result of an adjudication of bankruptcy or
a complete cessation of business. Instead of waiting for the company to declare formal bankruptcy, EWM
will mark the investment down to zero when there exists a reasonable expectation the entity might go
bankrupt.
Impaired
Impaired consists of maintaining an investment where we have reason to believe that events and/or
available data indicate that the investment may need a downward market value adjustment. Upon review
of the available financial and nonfinancial data, EWM shall indicate the degree of impairment to be
applied to the investment and an appropriate market value will then be applied to the issue. Generally,
speaking, the first impairment mark is 50% if we believe that the company is not on the right track and
will struggle to raise more capital and/or meet its financial goals. However, greater percentage
markdowns may be taken should the impairment appear to create more than transient barriers to the
investment’s long-term success.
Private investments made by EWM, by their nature, will generally be long-term investments that are not
intended to be liquidated on a short-term basis. Accordingly, valuations by EWM will not necessarily
represent the amount that might be realized from sales or dispositions of investments. Valuations will not
be adjusted on account of taxes or other expenses that might be incurred upon disposition. Debt will be
valued in combination with any equity investments in the same portfolio company
The foregoing valuation methods may be adjusted by EWM if and to the extent it shall determine that
such modifications are advisable in order to reflect any other factors affecting the value of investments.
EWM AI SPV LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Operating Agreement 2017.06.30 Revised_Signed_includes Exhibits Page 25 of 25
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 1
EWM ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENTS SPV, LLC-SERIES 2-UNICORN
TECHNOLOGY
A DESIGNATED SERIES OF
A DELAWARE SERIES LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY
SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 2
DEFINITIONS
“Fund” shall mean: EWM Alternative Investments SPV, LLC-Series 2-Unicorn
Technology
“Manager” shall mean: Endowment Wealth Management, Inc.
“Manager E-mail” shall mean: SPVs@EndowmentWM.com
“Manager Contact Information” shall mean:
Endowment Wealth Management, Inc.
2200 North Richmond Street, Suite 200
Appleton, WI 54911
920.785.6010
“Minimum Subscription Amount” shall mean $100,000, unless otherwise approved by
Manager.
“Member” shall mean a Member as defined in the Fund Operating Agreement.
“Subscription Documents” shall mean this Subscription Agreement, its exhibits, and
any documents incorporated by reference therein, including, but not limited to, the EWM
Alternative Investments SPV, LLC-Series 2-Unicorn Technology Operating Agreement
(defined herein as the “Fund Agreement”), the Management Agreement, and the Escrow
Agreement.
Capitalized words that are used but not defined herein shall have the meaning given
them in the Operating Agreement.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 3
Subscriber Name: ______________________
SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT
This Subscription Agreement (this “Agreement”) is entered into by and between the Fund
and the undersigned party signing the signature page hereof as Subscriber (the “Subscriber”), effective
as of the date set forth above the Manager’s signature on the Acceptance of Subscription on the
signature page of this Agreement. In consideration of the mutual covenants set forth in this Agreement
and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby
acknowledged, the Subscriber and the Fund hereby agree as follows.
1. Subscription.
(a) Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, the Subscriber hereby irrevocably
tenders this subscription (this “Subscription”) for an interest in the Fund (a “Fund Interest”) in the
amount set forth on the “Subscription Amount” line on the Subscriber’s applicable signature page
hereto (the “Signature Page”).

(b) This Subscription, when and if accepted by the Manager, as manager of the
Fund, will constitute a commitment to contribute to the Fund that portion of the Subscription Amount
accepted by the Manager (the “Commitment”) in accordance with terms of the Operating Agreement
of the Fund, as the same may be further amended from time to time (the “Fund Agreement”), in the
form separately furnished to the Subscriber. The Subscriber shall be admitted as a Member in the
Fund (“Member”) at the time this Subscription is accepted and executed by the Manager and the
Subscriber hereby irrevocably agrees to be bound by the Fund Agreement as a Member thereunder
and to be bound by all other Subscription Documents and to perform all obligations thereunder,
including making contributions to the Fund in accordance with the terms thereof. This Agreement
will become irrevocable with respect to the Subscriber at the time of its submission to the Fund and
may not be withdrawn by the Subscriber unless the Manager rejects this Subscription.
(c) The Manager, on behalf of the Fund, may accept or reject this Subscription,
in whole or in part, in its sole discretion. This Subscription shall be deemed to be accepted by the
Manager and this Agreement shall be binding against the Manager only upon execution and delivery
to the Subscriber of the Acceptance of Subscription attached hereto. At the Closing, the Manager will
execute the Acceptance of Subscription and deliver notice of such Closing to the Subscriber within a
reasonable time after such Closing. Upon such acceptance, the Subscriber shall be issued the Fund
Interest for which it has subscribed. Failure to deliver a fully-completed and executed Agreement may
result in the Fund rejecting this Subscription.
(d) The Fund has the unrestricted right to condition its acceptance of the
Subscriber’s subscription, in whole or in part, upon the receipt by the Fund of any additional
instruments (including any designations, representations, warranties, covenants), documentation, and
information requested by the Fund in its sole discretion, including an opinion of counsel to the
Subscriber, evidencing the legality of an investment in the Fund by the Subscriber and the authority
of the person executing this Agreement on behalf of the Subscriber (collectively the “Additional
Documents”), in addition to these Subscription Documents.
(e) The Subscriber understands that the Fund has entered into or expects to enter
into separate subscription agreements with other investors which are or shall be substantially similar
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 4
in all material respects to this Agreement providing for the admission of such other investors as
Members in the Fund. This Agreement and such separate subscription agreements are separate
agreements and the sale arrangements between the Fund and such other investors are separate sales.
The Subscriber also acknowledges that the Manager may enter into side letters with certain Members
(which may include the Subscriber) which contain terms different from those in this Agreement or
amend and supplement certain provisions of the Fund Agreement as it applies to such Members.
(f) Any Subscribers subscribing after the Late Investment Date established by
the Company (as defined in the Memorandum) shall pay to the Fund an additional amount equal to
simple interest at the Prime Rate as measured by the Wall Street Journal Prime Rate of Interest plus
two percent (2%) (the “Additional Amount”), on Subscriber’s Total Commitment, from the date of the
Fund’s Initial Closing to the date on which Subscriber’s funds are called by the Manager. Such
Additional Amount shall not be treated as a capital contribution or reduce the capital commitment of
Subscriber, but will be distributed by Manager to early investors in accordance with percentage of
interests held in the Fund as of the Late Investment Date. The Additional Amount may also be referred
to as the “Late Investment Fee.” Manager reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to waive the Late
Investment Fee for any single Subscriber on a case-by-case basis.
2. Representations and Warranties of the Subscriber.
The Subscriber hereby represents and warrants to the Fund as of the date of this
Agreement and as of the date of any capital contribution to the Fund (and the Subscriber agrees to
notify the Fund in writing immediately if any changes in the information set forth herein occur):
(a) The Subscriber is either an “Accredited Investor” within the meaning of Rule
501 under the Securities Act of 1933 (the “Securities Act”) and a “Qualified Client”, as defined in
Rule 205-3 as promulgated under the Investment Advisors Act of 1940, as amended, and has indicated
on Exhibit B the category under which the Subscriber qualifies as such. Subscriber shall complete the
Fund Manager’s Accredited Investor Due Diligence Worksheet attached hereto as Exhibit B-1.
(b)Neither the Subscriber, nor any of its shareholders, members, managers, general or
limited partners, directors, affiliates or executive officers, is subject to any of the “Bad Actor”
disqualifications described in Rule 506(d)(1)(i) to (viii) under the Securities Act (a “Disqualification
Event”), except for a Disqualification Event covered by Rule 506(d)(2) or (d)(3).
(c) The Subscriber is purchasing the Fund Interestsolely for the Subscriber’s own account
for investment purposes only and not with a view to the sale or distribution of any part or all thereof
by public or private sale or other disposition. The Subscriber understands that no public market exists
for the Fund Interest and that the Fund Interest may have to be held for an indefinite period of time.
The Subscriber has no intention of selling, granting any participation in or otherwise dividing,
distributing or disposing of any portion of the Fund Interest, except that participants in and
beneficiaries of any Subscriber that is a Qualified Plan Investor (as defined below) shall benefit as
provided in plan documents.
(d)The Subscriber understands that the Fund Interest has not been and will not be
registered under the Securities Act, or approved or disapproved by the U.S. Securities and Exchange
Commission or by any state securities administrator, or registered or qualified under any state
securities law. The Fund Interest is being offered and sold in reliance on exemptions from the
registration requirements of both the Securities Act and applicable state securities laws, and the Fund
Interest may not be transferred by the Subscriber except in compliance with the Fund Agreement and
applicable laws and regulations.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 5
(e) The Subscriber (either alone or with the Subscriber’s professional advisers who are
unaffiliated with the Fund, the Manager, or its affiliates) has such knowledge and experience in
financial and business matters that the Subscriber is capable of evaluating the merits and risks of an
investment in the Fund Interest and has the capacity to protect the Subscriber’s own interest in
connection with the Subscriber’s proposed investment in the Fund Interest. The Subscriber
understands that an investment in the Fund Interest is highly speculative and the Subscriber is able to
bear the economic risk of such investment for an indefinite period of time and the loss of the
Subscriber’s entire investment.
(f) All questions of the Subscriber related to the Subscriber’s investment in the Fund
Interest have been answered to the full satisfaction of the Subscriber and the Subscriber has received
all the information the Subscriber considers necessary or appropriate for deciding whether to purchase
the Fund Interest.
(g)This Agreement, upon acceptance by the Fund, will constitute a valid and legally
binding obligation of the Subscriber, enforceable in accordance with its terms except to the extent
limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, or other laws affecting the enforcement
of creditors’ rights generally and by principles of equity.
(h)If the Subscriber is a natural person, the Subscriber (i) has full legal capacity to
execute and deliver this Agreement and to perform the Partner’s obligations hereunder and (ii) is a
bona fide resident of the state or jurisdiction of residence set forth on Exhibit A and has no present
intention of becoming a resident of any other state or jurisdiction.
(i) If the Subscriber is not a natural person, the Subscriber (i) is duly organized and has
all requisite power to execute and deliver this Agreement and perform its obligations hereunder, (ii)
has taken all necessary action to duly authorize the execution, delivery and performance of this
Agreement, and (iii) was not organized for the specific purpose of acquiring the Fund Interest.
(j) Other than as set forth herein or in the Fund Agreement (and any separate agreement
in writing with the Fund executed in conjunction with the Subscriber’s subscription for the Fund
Interest), the Subscriber is not relying upon any information, representation or warranty by the Fund,
the Manager or any of its respective agents or representatives in determining to invest in the Fund. The
Subscriber has consulted, to the extent deemed appropriate by the Subscriber, with the Subscriber’s
own advisers as to the financial, tax, legal, and other matters concerning an investment in the Fund
Interest and on that basis and the basis of its own independent investigations, without the assistance of
the Fund, the Manager or any of its respective agents or representatives, believes that an investment in
the Fund Interest is suitable and appropriate for the Subscriber. Subscriber hereby represents and
warrants that it has had its own independent legal counsel review and approve all of the legal
documents executed in connection with its Subscription.
(k)The Subscriber has received and read a copy of the Fund’s confidential private
placement memorandum (the “Memorandum”) and understands the risks and expenses of an
investment in the Fund. The Subscriber acknowledges that it has reviewed and understands the
“Conflicts of Interest” section of the Memorandum, and further understands that (i) the Manager and
its affiliates (A) may carry on investment activities for their own accounts, for family members and
friends who do not invest in the Fund; (B) may give advice and recommend investments to their
respective family and friends that differs from advice given to, or investments recommended or bought
for, the Fund, even though their business or investment objectives may be the same or similar; and (C)
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 6
will be engaged in activities, including investment activities, apart from their management of the Fund
as permitted by this Agreement; (ii) certain employees of the Manager are expected to continue to
perform services for the Manager and its affiliates, as well as for new investment funds and accounts
that the Manager may hereafter establish in such manner as the Manager, in its sole discretion, deems
appropriate (subject to the limitations on the timing of such establishment, as described below); (iii)
certain other selling, general, and administrative expenses will be shared by the Fund and companies
affiliated with the Manager; (iv) the Fund may co-invest with affiliates of the Manager; and (v) the
Fund may use affiliates of the Manager to provide certain services to the Fund. The Subscriber was
offered the Fund Interest through private negotiations and not through any general solicitation or
general advertising, unless the Fund Interest is being offered pursuant to Rule 506(c) under the
Securities Act, and in the state listed in the Subscriber’s permanent address set forth on the Signature
Page attached hereto or previously provided to the Manager and intends that the securities laws of that
state govern the Subscriber’s subscription.
(l) The Subscriber understands and acknowledges that (i) any description of the Fund’s
business and prospects given to the Subscriber is not necessarily exhaustive, (ii) all estimates,
projections and forward-looking statements were based upon the best judgment of the Fund’s
management at the time such estimates or projections were made and that whether or not such
estimates, projections, or forward-looking statements will materialize will depend upon many factors
that are out of the control of the Fund, and (iii) there is no assurance that any projections, estimates, or
forward-looking statements will be attained.
(m) The Subscriber’s information provided in this Agreement (including the exhibits
hereto) is complete and accurate and may be relied upon by the Fund and the Manager. Additionally,
by executing the Subscription Agreement, the Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that any
identifying information or documentation regarding the Subscriber and/or its suitability to invest in
the Fund that was furnished by the Subscriber to the Fund, the Manager or their affiliates online, or
via e-mail, whether in connection with this subscription or previously, may be made available to the
Manager, remains true and correct in all respects and may, at the discretion of the Manager, be
incorporated by reference herein (collectively, “Supporting Documents”).
(n)Neither this Subscription nor any of the Subscriber’s contributions of Commitments
do or will directly or indirectly contravene applicable laws and regulations, including anti-moneylaundering laws and regulations. The Subscriber understands and agrees that the Fund may undertake
any actions that the Fund deems necessary or appropriate to ensure compliance with applicable laws,
rules, and regulations regarding money laundering or terrorism. In furtherance of such efforts, the
Subscriber hereby represents, covenants, and agrees that to the best of the Subscriber’s knowledge
based on reasonable investigation.
(i) None of the Subscriber’s capital contributions to the Fund (whether payable in cash
or otherwise) shall be derived from money laundering or similar activities deemed illegal under
federal laws and regulations.
(ii)To the extent within the Subscriber’s control, none of the Subscriber’s capital
contributions to the Fund will cause the Fund or any of its personnel to be in violation of federal antimoney laundering laws, including without limitation the Bank Secrecy Act (31 U.S.C. 5311 et seq.),
the United States Money Laundering Control Act of 1986 or the International Money Laundering
Abatement and Anti-Terrorist Financing Act of 2001, and any regulations promulgated thereunder.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 7
(iii) The Subscriber acknowledges that due to anti-money laundering
requirements operating in the United States, as well as the Fund’s own internal anti-money laundering
policies, the Fund and the Manager may require further identification of the Subscriber and the source
of its capital contribution before these Subscription Documents can be processed and capital
contributions can be accepted or distributions made. When requested by the Manager, the Subscriber
will provide any and all additional information, and the Subscriber understands and agrees that the
Manager may release confidential information about the Subscriber (and, if applicable, any underlying
beneficial owner or Related Person to any person) if the Manager has determined that such release is
necessary to ensure compliance with all applicable laws and regulations concerning money laundering
and similar activities; provided, that prior to releasing any such information, the Manager shall confirm
with counsel that such release is necessary to so ensure said compliance.
(o)Except as otherwise disclosed in writing to the Manager, the Subscriber represents
and warrants that neither it, nor to the best of its knowledge and belief after due inquiry, the Beneficial
Owners (as defined below), nor any person or entity controlled by, controlling or under common
control with the Subscriber or the Beneficial Owners, nor any person having a beneficial or economic
interest in the Subscriber or the Beneficial Owners, any person for whom the Subscriber is acting as
agent or nominee in connection with this investment, nor in the case of a Subscriber which is an entity,
any Related Person is:
(i) a Prohibited Investor;1
(ii) a Senior Foreign Political Figure,2
any member of a Senior Foreign
Political Figure’s “immediate family,” which includes the figure’s parents, siblings, spouse, children
and in-laws, or any Close Associate3 of a Senior Foreign Political Figure, or a person or entity resident
in, or organized or chartered under, the laws of a Non-Cooperative Jurisdiction;4
(iii) a person or entity resident in, or organized or chartered under, the
laws of a jurisdiction that has been designated by the U.S. Secretary of the Treasury under Section 311
or 312 of the USA PATRIOT Act as warranting special measures due to money laundering concerns;
or

1 For purposes of this subparagraph (d), “Prohibited Investor” shall mean a person or entity whose name
appears on (i) the List of Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons maintained by the U.S. Office of
Foreign Assets Control; (ii) other lists of prohibited persons and entities as may be mandated by applicable law or
regulation; or (iii) such other lists of prohibited persons and entities as may be provided to the Fund in connection
therewith.
2 For purposes of this subparagraph (d), “Senior Foreign Political Figure” shall mean a senior official in the
executive, legislative, administrative, military or judicial branches of a foreign government (whether elected or not),
a senior official of a major foreign political party, or a senior executive of a foreign government-owned corporation.
In addition, a Senior Foreign Political Figure includes any corporation, business or other entity that has been formed
by, or for the benefit of, a Senior Foreign Political Figure.
3 For purposes of this subparagraph (d), “Close Associate of a Senior Foreign Political Figure” shall mean
a person who is widely and publicly known internationally to maintain an unusually close relationship with the Senior
Foreign Political Figure, and includes a person who is in a position to conduct substantial domestic and international
financial transactions on behalf of the Senior Foreign Political Figure.
4 For purposes of this subparagraph (d), “Non-Cooperative Jurisdiction” shall mean any foreign country that
has been designated as non-cooperative with international anti-money laundering principles or procedures by an
intergovernmental group or organization, such as the Financial Task Force on Money Laundering, of which the U.S.
is a member and with which designation the U.S. representative to the group or organization continues to concur.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 8
(iv) a person or entity who gives the Subscriber reason to believe that its
funds originate from, or will be or have been routed through, an account maintained at a Foreign Shell
Bank,5
an “offshore bank,” or a bank organized or chartered under the laws of a Non-Cooperative
Jurisdiction.
(p)The Subscriber understands the rights, obligations and restrictions of Members,
including that withdrawals of capital from the Fund by Members are limited by the terms of the Fund
Agreement.
(q)The Subscriber understands that the Fund intends to operate in such a manner that
(i) an investment in the Fund will be a permissible investment for Qualified Plan Investors and (ii) the
Fund will qualify for an exemption from the “look through” rule of the Plan Asset Regulations (U.S.
Department of Labor regulation 20 C.F.R. section 2510.3-101), including limiting the holdings of
Qualified Plan Investors to less than 25 percent of the Fund Interests.
(r) If the Subscriber is or would be an investment company (as defined by the Company
Act) but for the exceptions contained in section 3(c)(1) or section 3(c)(7) of the Company Act, (i) the
Subscriber’s Fund Interest does not represent 40% or more of the total assets and committed capital of
the Subscriber, (ii) the Subscriber has informed the Manager of the number of persons that constitute
“beneficial owners” of such Subscriber’s outstanding securities (other than short-term paper) within
the meaning of clause (A) of subsection 3(c)(1) of Company Act, and will inform the Manager
promptly upon any change in that number, and (iii) the Subscriber agrees that the Manager may require
the Subscriber to withdraw at any time so much of its Fund Interest as is necessary to keep such Fund
Interest below 10% of the total Fund Interests.
(s) If the Subscriber is an “employee benefit plan” as defined in section 3(3) of the U.S.
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (“ERISA”), a plan with respect to
which section 4975 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended (the “Code”) applies or an entity or
account whose assets are deemed to include assets of any such plan (a “Qualified Plan Investor”), (i)
the Subscriber has completed and complied with the instructions set forth in Exhibit C to this
Agreement, if any, making the representations and warranties referenced therein and (ii) if the Manager
or any partner, employee or agent of the Manager is ever held to be a fiduciary, the fiduciary
responsibilities, if any, of that person shall be limited to the person’s duties in administering the

5 For purposes of this subparagraph (d), “Foreign Shell Bank” shall mean a Foreign Bank without a Physical
Presence in any country, but does not include a Regulated Affiliate.
A “Foreign Bank” shall mean an organization that (i) is organized under the laws of a foreign country, (ii)
engages in the business of banking, (iii) is recognized as a bank by the bank supervisory or monetary authority of the
country of its organization or principal banking operations, (iv) receives deposits to a substantial extent in the regular
course of its business, and (v) has the power to accept demand deposits, but does not include the U.S. branches or
agencies of a foreign bank.
“Physical Presence” shall mean a place of business that is maintained by a Foreign Bank and is located at a
fixed address, other than solely a post office box or an electronic address, in a country in which the Foreign Bank is
authorized to conduct banking activities, at which location the Foreign Bank (i) employs one or more individuals on
a full-time basis, (ii) maintains operating records related to its banking activities, and (iii) is subject to inspection by
the banking authority that licensed the Foreign Bank to conduct banking activities.
“Regulated Affiliate” shall mean a Foreign Shell Bank that is an affiliate of a depository institution, credit
union or Foreign Bank that maintains a Physical Presence in the U.S. or a foreign country regulating such affiliated
depository institution, credit union or Foreign Bank.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 9
business of the Fund, and such person shall not be responsible for any other duties with respect to any
Qualified Plan Investor.
(t) The Subscriber understands the meaning and legal consequences of the
representations and warranties made by the Subscriber herein, and that the Manager is relying on such
representations and warranties in making its determination to accept or reject this Agreement.
(u)The Subscriber understands the risks involved with acquiring the Interests,
understands the business of the Fund and the Portfolio Company, has thoroughly read and understands
all of the provisions of the Operating Agreement and can withstand a total loss of its capital
contribution. The Subscriber is making the investment described herein to indirectly acquire the
Portfolio Company Securities indirectly through the Fund and is making this investment in the Fund
in lieu of making an investment in the Portfolio Company directly. The Subscriber has read the
Memorandum, including the risk factors therein (which may not be an exhaustive list), and understands
the risks associated with the investment in the Interests and the investment by the Fund in the Portfolio
Company.
3. Certificates. The Subscriber understands and agrees that, as permitted by applicable
law, the Fund Interest will not be represented by a certificate unless otherwise determined by the
Manager. If the Manager determines to have the Fund Interest be represented by a certificate, such
certificate shall bear such legends as the Fund considers advisable to facilitate compliance with the
Securities Act or any other securities law or any other restrictions placed on such Fund Interest.
4. Liability. The Subscriber agrees that neither the Fund, the Manager nor any of their
respective affiliates, nor their respective managers, officers, directors, members, equity holders,
employees, or other applicable representatives (collectively, the “Fund, the Manager and their
Affiliated Persons”), shall incur any liability (a) in respect of any action taken upon any information
provided to the Fund by the Subscriber (including any Supporting Documents or Additional
Documents) or for relying on any notice, consent, request, instructions or other instrument believed,
in good faith, to be genuine or to be signed by properly authorized persons on behalf of the Subscriber,
including any document transmitted by email or (b) for adhering to applicable anti-money laundering
obligations whether now or hereinafter in effect.
5. Conflict of Interest. The Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that the Manager and
its affiliates will be subject to various conflicts of interest in carrying out the Manager’s responsibilities
to the Fund. Other funds may be formed in the future with objectives that are the same as or similar
to the Fund’s objectives.
6. Confidentiality. The Subscriber shall keep confidential, and not make use of or
disclose to any person (other than for purposes reasonably related to its interest in the Fund or as
required by law), any information or matter received from or relating to the Fund; provided that the
Subscriber may disclose any such information to the extent that such information (i) is or becomes
generally available to the public through no act or omission of the Subscriber, (ii) was already in the
possession of the Subscriber at the time of such disclosure or (iii) is communicated to the Subscriber
by a third party without violation of confidentiality obligations.
7. USA PATRIOT Act. To comply with applicable laws, rules, and regulations
designed to combat money laundering or terrorism, the Subscriber shall provide the information on
Exhibit D hereto.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 10
8. Beneficial Ownership. The Subscriber represents and warrants that it is subscribing
for Interests for Subscriber’s own account and own risk, unless the Subscriber advises the Fund to the
contrary in writing and identifies with specificity supplementally each Beneficial Owner (as defined
below) as well as such other information and/or documentation as may be requested or required by the
Manager. The Subscriber also represents that it does not have the intention or obligation to sell,
distribute or transfer its Interests or any portion thereof, directly or indirectly, to any other person or
entity or to any nominee account. If the Subscriber is subscribing on behalf of a Beneficial Owner,
then the Subscriber represents that all subscription payments transferred to the Subscriber with respect
to such Beneficial Owner originated directly from a bank or brokerage Account in the name of such
Beneficial Owner.
The Subscriber represents and warrants that the Subscriber is not (a) acting as trustee,
custodian, agent, representative, or nominee for (or with respect to) another person or entity
(howsoever characterized and regardless of whether such person or entity is deemed to have a property
interest, or the like, with respect to such Interests under local law) or (b) an entity (other than a publiclytraded company listed on an organized exchange (or a subsidiary or a pension fund of such a company)
based in a FATF-Compliant Jurisdiction (as defined below) investing on behalf of underlying investors
(including a Fund-of-Funds) (the persons, entities and underlying investors referred to in (a) and (b)
being referred to collectively as the “Beneficial Owners”). If the preceding sentence is not true, the
Subscriber represents and warrants that:
(i) The Subscriber understands and acknowledges that the representations, warranties,
and agreements made herein are made by the Subscriber (A) with respect to the Subscriber and (B)
with respect to each of the Beneficial Owners;
(ii) The Subscriber has all requisite power and authority from each of the Beneficial
Owners to execute and perform the obligations under these Subscription Documents and to bind each
such Beneficial Owner as a party hereto;
(iii) The Subscriber has adopted and implemented anti-money laundering policies,
procedures and controls that comply, and will continue to comply, in all respects, with the requirements
of applicable anti-money laundering laws and regulations; and
(iv) The Subscriber has verified, or has access to, the identity of each Beneficial Owner,
holds evidence of such identity and will make such evidence, together with any other documentation
or information reasonably necessary to support the accuracy of Subscriber’s representations and
warranties contained herein, available to the Fund upon request, and has procedures in place to ensure
that the Beneficial Owners are not Prohibited Investors.
9. “Big Boy” Provision. In view of the fact that Subscriber is sophisticated, has had
access to information sufficient to make an investment decision and has conducted its own due
diligence, and has made its investment decision without reliance on (i) the Manager, (ii) any material
information the Manager may have about the Portfolio Company Securities and Portfolio Company,
or (iii) any disclosures of non-public information that may have been made to the Manager (or that the
Manager may have independently obtained), and further in view of all of the representations
Subscriber has made in Section 2, Subscriber hereby irrevocably: (i) waives any right to any and all
actions, suits, proceedings, investigations, claims, or liabilities of any nature, including but not limited
to actions under Rule 10b-5 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or similar laws (collectively
“Claims”) that may arise from or relate to the possession of or failure to disclose non-public
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 11
information; (ii) releases any Claims against the Manager or any other party; and (iii) agrees to refrain
from pursuing against any Claims against such parties.
10.Survival. The representations, warranties, and agreements contained in this
Agreement shall survive the execution of this Agreement by the Subscriber and acceptance of this
Agreement by the Fund.
11.Additional Information. The Subscriber agrees that, upon demand, it will promptly
furnish any information, and execute and deliver such documents, as reasonably required by the
Manager and furnish any information relating to the Subscriber’s relationship with the Fund as
required by governmental agencies having jurisdiction over the Fund.
12.Assignment and Successors. This Agreement may be assigned by the Subscriber
only with the prior written consent of the Fund. Subject to the foregoing, this Agreement (including
the provisions of Section 6) shall be binding on the respective successors, assigns, heirs, and legal
representatives of the parties hereto.
13.No Third Party Beneficiaries. This Agreement shall not confer any rights or
remedies upon any person, other than the parties hereto.
14.Amendment; Waiver. Neither this Agreement nor any term hereof may be amended
other than by written consent of the Subscriber and the Fund. No provision hereof may be waived
other than in a writing signed by the waiving party. Unless expressly provided otherwise, no waiver
shall constitute an ongoing or future waiver of any provision hereof.
15.Governing Law. This Agreement is governed by and shall be construed in
accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to conflict of laws principles. For
the purpose of any judicial proceeding to enforce an award or incidental to arbitration or to compel
arbitration, the Subscriber and the Fund hereby submit to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of the courts
located in the Arbitration Location, and agree that service of process in such arbitration or court
proceedings shall be satisfactorily made upon it if sent by registered mail addressed to it at the address
set forth on the Subscriber Information page and Definitions page respectively.
16.Entire Agreement. This Agreement, the Fund Agreement, and any side letter entered
into between the Manager or the Fund and the Subscriber, and all of the exhibits and appendices
attached hereto and thereto, constitutes the entire agreement and understanding between the parties
with respect to the subject matter hereof and thereof and supersedes any prior written or oral
agreements or understandings of the parties with respect thereto.
17.Notice. All communications hereunder shall be in writing and delivered in person, by
registered or certified mail, by electronic mail or otherwise delivered to the Subscriber at the applicable
address or number set forth on Exhibit A hereto and to the Fund at the address or number set forth in
the Definitions hereto, or at such other place as the receiving party may designate to the other party by
written notice. Each such communication shall be deemed received on the earlier of (i) receipt, (ii)
personal delivery, (iii) transmission by electronic mail (with evidence of transmission from the
transmitting device), (iv) one business day after deposit with a nationally recognized overnight courier
service, or (v) three business days after being sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt
requested, postage prepaid.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 12
18.Severability. If any provision of this Agreement is held by applicable authority to be
unlawful, void or unenforceable to any extent, such provision, to the extent necessary, shall be severed
from this Agreement and the remainder of this Agreement shall not be affected thereby and shall
continue in full force and effect.
19.Copies and Counterparts. Copies of signatures to this Agreement shall be valid,
binding and effective as original signatures for all purposes hereunder. This Agreement may be
executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original but all of which taken
together shall constitute one (1) agreement.
20.Electronic Delivery of Disclosures and Schedule K-1. The Subscriber understands
that the Fund and the Manager expect to deliver tax return information, including Schedule K-1s (each,
a “K-1”) to the Subscriber by either electronic mail, a posting to a Subscriber-accessible platform or
some other form of electronic delivery. Pursuant to IRS Rev. Proc. 2012-17 (Feb. 13, 2012), the
Subscriber hereby expressly understands, consents to and acknowledges such electronic delivery of
tax returns and related information.
If the Subscriber needs to update the Subscriber’s contact information that is on file, please email the
update to the Manager. The Subscriber will be notified if there are any changes to the contact
information of the Fund.
The Subscriber’s K-1 may be required to be printed and attached to a federal, state, or local income
tax return.
BY SIGNING THIS AGREEMENT, THE SUBSCRIBER:
(i) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT ANY MISSTATEMENT MAY RESULT IN AN
IMMEDIATE REDEMPTION OF SUBSCRIBER’S INTERESTS.
(ii) AGREES THAT IF THE FUND BELIEVES THAT SUBSCRIBER OR A
BENEFICIAL OWNER OF SUBSCRIBER IS A PROHIBITED INVESTOR, THE FUND MAY
BE OBLIGATED TO FREEZE SUBSCRIBER’S INVESTMENT, DECLINE TO MAKE
DISTRIBUTIONS OR SEGREGATE THE ASSETS CONSTITUTING SUBSCRIBER’S
INVESTMENT WITH THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE LAW.
(iii) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT SUBSCRIBER HAS RECEIVED (1) A COPY OF
THE MANAGER’S PRIVACY NOTICE, AND (2) A COPY OF THE MANAGER’S FORM
ADV BROCHURE PARTS 2A AND 2B.
(Signature Pages Follow)
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 13
SIGNATURE PAGE TO SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT
INDIVIDUALS
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Subscriber hereby executes this Agreement as of the date set
forth below.
Date:
Total Subscription Amount: $___________________
Late Investment Fee: $___________________________
Subscriber #1: Subscriber #2: (if more than one individual)
(Signature) (Signature)
(Print Name) (Print Name)
ACCEPTANCE OF SUBSCRIPTION
By signing below, the Fund hereby accepts Subscriber’s subscription for Interests in the Fund in the
amount indicated on this Signature Page to Subscription agreement, and hereby authorizes this
signature page to be attached to the Subscription Agreement related to the Fund. By executing this
Agreement, Subscriber hereby irrevocably agrees to be bound by this Agreement and to all
Subscription Documents, including but not limited to, the EWM Alternative Investments SPV, LLCSeries 2-Unicorn Technology Operating Agreement dated January 18, 2017, as restated on June 30,
2017, and to perform all obligations thereunder.
THE FUND: EWM ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENTS SPV, LLC-SERIES 2-UNICORN
TECHNOLOGY
By: ________________________________ Date: ________________________
Prateek Mehrotra, Secretary and Vice President
of Endowment Wealth Management, Inc.,
Manager of the Fund
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 14
SIGNATURE PAGE TO SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT
ENTITIES
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Subscriber hereby executes this Agreement as of the date set
forth below.
Date:
Total Subscription Amount: $___________________
Late Investment Fee: $___________________________
Subscriber:
(Name of Subscriber)
(Signature of Signatory)
(Print Name of Signatory)
(Title of Signatory)
ACCEPTANCE OF SUBSCRIPTION
By signing below, the Fund hereby accepts Subscriber’s subscription for Interests in the Fund in the
amount indicated on this Signature Page to Subscription agreement, and hereby authorizes this
signature page to be attached to the Subscription Agreement related to the Fund. By executing this
Agreement, Subscriber hereby irrevocably agrees to be bound by this Agreement and to all
Subscription Documents, including but not limited to, This page shall also serve as Subscriber’s
signature page to the EWM Alternative Investments SPV, LLC-Series 2-Unicorn Technology
Operating Agreement dated January 18, 2017, as restated on June 30, 2017, and to perform all
obligations thereunder.
THE FUND: EWM ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENTS SPV, LLC-SERIES 2-UNICORN
TECHNOLOGY
By: ________________________________ Date: ________________________
Prateek Mehrotra, Secretary and Vice President
of Endowment Wealth Management, Inc.,
Its Manager
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 15
EXHIBIT A
SUBSCRIBER INFORMATION
1. Name of Subscriber (as it is to be titled on Fund documents):
2. Subscription Amount:
3. U.S. Taxpayer Identification Number or Social Security Number (if applicable):
4. Jurisdiction and Date of Organization (for Trusts/ entities):
5. Subscriber’s Address of Residence or Principal Place of Business:
6. Address for Delivery and Notices (if different from above):
7. Phone Number:
8. Email Address:
9. For all Subscribers:
I agree to electronic delivery of disclosures and Schedule K-1
10. For Non-Individuals (check one):
Manager
Limited Partnership
Limited Liability Company
Corporation
Individual Retirement Account (custodian or trustee must sign)
Trust (other than IRA) (trustee must sign)
Qualified Plan (other than IRA)
Other: ___________________________
11. For Individuals (check one)
Single Individual (one signatory required)
Joint Tenants with Right of Survivorship (each individual must sign)
Tenants-in-Common (each individual must sign)
Community Property (one signatory required)
Other: ___________________________
12. For Investors who are not a U.S. Persons (as defined in Section 2(s) above):
Copy of Passport (attached)
13. The following IRS form is filled out, signed, and attached (check one):
W-9 (for Investors who are U.S. Persons)
W-8BEN (for Individual Investors who are not a U.S. Person)
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 16
W-8BEN-E (for Non-Individual Investors who are not a U.S. Person)
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 17
EXHIBIT B
ACCREDITED INVESTOR STATUS AND OTHER QUALIFICATIONS
Accredited Investor Status—All must complete
Reason For This Questionnaire. Subscriber must be an “accredited investor” as defined
in Rule 501(a) of Regulation D under the Securities Act of 1933. By marking the appropriate
box(es) below, Subscriber indicates each category under which Subscriber is an accredited
investor.
Check one or more of the boxes on this page and the next page.
☐ A. Individual-Income Test. An individual who had income in excess of $200,000
in each of the two most recent years (or had joint income with his or her spouse in
excess of $300,000 in each of those years) and has a reasonable expectation of
reaching the same income level in the current year.
☐ B. Individual- Net Worth Test. An individual who has a net worth (or joint net
worth with his or her spouse) in excess of $1,000,000. For the purpose of
calculating Investor’s net worth, equity in Investor’s primary residence shall not be
included.
☐ C. IRA-Beneficiary Makes Investment Decisions and is Accredited. An
individual retirement account (“IRA”) whose beneficiary is an individual who (1)
makes investment decisions for IRA, and (2) is an accredited investor on the basis
of Box A or B above.
☐ D. IRA- Person other than Beneficiary Makes Investment Decisions and Decision
Maker is Accredited. An individual retirement account (“IRA”) who investment
decisions are made by an individual or entity other than the IRA beneficiary, and
that decision –maker is an accredited investor under Category(ies) ______ in this
Questionnaire. In the blank, please insert the letter of each Category in this
Questionnaire that applies to the decision-maker.
☐ E. Revocable Trust other than IRA- Income or Net Worth Test Applied to
Grantor(s) and Decision- Maker. A revocable trust (other than an IRA) , and (1)
each grantor of the trust is an accredited investor on the basis of Box A or B above,
and (2) the person who makes investment decisions for Investor is an accredited
investor under Category(ies) ____________ in this Questionnaire. In the blank,
please insert the letter of each Category in this Questionnaire that applies to the
decision-maker.
☐ F. Self-Directed Pension Plan other than IRA- Income or Net Worth Test Applied
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 18
to Participant. A self-directed pension plan (other than an IRA), and the participant
who directed that assets of his or her account be invested in the Funds (1) an
accredited investor on the basis of Box A or B above, and (2) the only participant
who account is being invested in the Fund.
☐ G. Other Pension Plan. A pension plan that is not a self-directed plan, and either
(1) the plan has total assets in excess of $5,000,000; or (2) the plan’s investment
decisions are made by a plan fiduciary that is a bank, savings and loan association,
insurance company or registered investment adviser.
☐ H. Irrevocable Trust. An irrevocable trust that consists of a single trust (1) with
total assets in excess of $5,000,000, and (2) which was not formed the specific
purpose of investing in the Fund, and (3) whose purchase is directed by a person
who has such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters that he
or she is capable or evaluating the merits and risks of the prospective investment.
☐ I. Corporation, Partnership, Business Trust. A corporation, a partnership, a
Massachusetts or similar business trust, or an organization described in Section
501(c)(3) if the Internal Revenue Code, that was not formed for specific purpose of
acquiring an interest in the Fund, with total assets in excess of $5,000,000.
☐ J. Other Entities. Any of the following entities that has a net worth of at least
$5,000,000:
☐ a bank, as defined in Section 3(a)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933;
☐ acting for its own account;
☐ acting in a fiduciary capacity;
☐ a savings and loan association or similar institution, as defined in Section
3(a)(5)(A) of the Securities Act of 1933;
☐ acting for its own account;
☐ acting in a fiduciary capacity;
☐ a broker-dealer registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;
☐ an insurance company, as defined in Section 2(13) of the Securities Act of
1933
☐ an investment company registered under the Investment company act of
1940;
☐ a “business development company,” as defined in Section 2(a)(48) of the
Investment Company Act of 1940
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 19
☐ a small business investment company licensed under Section 301(c) or
301(d) of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958, as amended;
☐ a “private business development company” as defined in Section
202(a)(22) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940.
☐ K. Entity Wholly Owned by Accredited Investors. An entity in which all of the
equity owners are accredited investors.
If this box is checked; Please make an additional copy of this Exhibit B for each
equity owner of the entity. On each copy, write one equity owner’s name and
indicate the category(ies) above under which the equity owner is an accredited
investor. Subscriber may be asked to provide additional information about its
equity.
☐ L. NONE OF THE ABOVE APPLIES (Further information may be required to
determine Subscriber’s accredited investor status)
Qualified Client Status—All must complete.
Reason For This Questionnaire. The General Partner will receive performancebased compensation. With some experience, performance-based compensation arrangements
are permitted only for “qualified clients” as defined in Rule 205-3 under the Investment
Advisers Act of 1940 (“Qualified Clients”). By marking the appropriate box(es) in this
questionnaire, Subscriber indicates each category under which Subscriber is a Qualified
Client. If no Qualified Client category applies, Subscriber should check the final box.
Please check one or more boxes below:
☐A. Qualified Purchaser. Subscriber is a natural person, a trust owned jointly with spouse,
or a Company (other than a Look-Through Entity) that is a “Qualified Purchaser” as
defined in Section 2(a)(51)(A) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 or related rules
thereunder (a “Qualified Purchaser”).
☐ B. Individual Subscriber with $2,100,000 Net Worth. Subscriber is a natural person, trust
owned jointly with spouse, or a company (other than a Look-Through Entity) whose next
worth exceeds $2,100,000 (excluding equity in Investor’s primary residence), taking into
account assets held jointly with Investor’s spouse.
☐ C. Individual Subscriber with $1,000,000 Under Management. Investor is a natural person,
a trust owned jointly with spouse, or Company (other than a Look-Through Entity) who,
immediately after entering into this Agreement, will have at least $1,000,000 under the
management of the Investment Manager.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 20
☐ D. Certain Management Person of Manager. Subscriber is an executive officer, director,
trustee, general partner, or person serving in a similar capacity, of the Manager.
“Executive officer” includes the president, any vice president in charge of a principal
business unit, divisions, or function (such as sales, administration or finance), any other
person (whether or not an officer) who performs similar policy-making functions, and
any officer who performs any policy-making functions.
☐ E. Certain Employees of Manager. Subscriber is an employee of the Manager (other than
an employee performing solely clerical, secretarial or administrative functions) who
participates in the Manager’s investment activities in connection with the employee’s
regular duties, provided that the employee has been performing those duties for the
Manager, or substantially similar functions or duties for another Company, for at least 12
months.
☐ F. Look-Through Entity Owned by Qualified Clients. Subscriber is a private investment
company, an investment company registered under the Investment Company Act, or a
business development company (a “Look-Through Entity”). If Subscriber is a LookThrough Entity, each equity owner of such Look-Through Entity will be considered a
client and will be required to represent that it is a Qualified Client (upon one of the criteria
set forth in (A) through (D) above). Please contact the Manager.
☐ G. SUBSCRIBER IS NONE OF THE ABOVE. Please explain below how each equity
owner of Subscriber satisfies Qualified Client status. (Further information may be
required to determine Subscriber’s Qualified Client Status) Enter details below:
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 21
EXHIBIT B-1
ACCREDITED INVESTOR DUE DILIGENCE WORKSHEET
Investment: EWM Alternative investments SPV, LLC-Series 2-Unicorn Technologies
Name of Investor: _________________________________________________________________
Name of Investor 2 (spousal/joint/trust accounts): ________________________________________
Investor Type: □ Individual □ Joint □ Irrevocable Trust □ Revocable Trust □ Partnership
□ Other _____________________________________________________________
Account Title: _____________________________________________________________________
Accreditation/qualified client verification (check all that apply):
Income Verification
□ Subscriber(s) annual income exceeds $200k (for individuals) or $300k (for couples)
gross income for each of last two years AND is expected to exceed this level for current
tax year. If box is checked, provide supporting documentation (two most recent years’ tax
returns, W2s, Form 1099, K-1 or other supporting documents).
__________(initial here) client confirms they will earn $200k (for individuals) or
$300k (for couples) during current tax year.
Net Worth Verification (for individuals/revocable trusts)
□ Subscriber or together with Subscriber’s spouse has a net worth that (check one):
□ Exceeds $1 million, excluding the value of primary residence
□ Exceeds $2.1 million of investable assets
□ Exceeds $5 million of investable assets
Please present documentation to support net worth statement above. Please
provide supporting documentation, which may include recent (within the past 3
months) financial statements from financial institutions (banks, brokerage firms,
insurance, 401k), or, land/property deed, vehicle titles, etc. along with
documentation of outstanding liabilities/outstanding loans that will allow
Manager to determine net worth. In lieu of copies of aforementioned statements,
a signed letter from your accountant, attorney, or financial professional stating
that your investable assets exceed the checked level is acceptable.
Net Worth Verification (Irrevocable Trusts, Corporations, Other Entities
□ Subscriber is a qualified purchaser with Investable assets in excess of $5MM (attach
recent statements or letter from accountant, attorney or financial professional that
investable assets exceed $5MM.
By signing below, I/we represent that my responses are true and correct and I/we have attached,
or agree to provide recent documents (within past three months) as supporting documentation for
my/our responses.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 22
In addition, I/we authorize Endowment Wealth Management, Inc. to conduct a credit check for
the individuals, trusts, or entity liabilities if, at Manager’s discretion, one is deemed necessary to
make an accredited/qualified investor determination.
Subscriber 1 Subscriber 2 (if applicable)
Signed: ______________________________ Signed: ______________________________
Printed Name: ________________________ Printed Name: ________________________
Title: ________________________________ Title: ________________________________
Date: ________________________________ Date: ________________________________
Reviewed & Approved by: _____________________________________________________
Date: _____________________________________________________________________
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 23
EXHIBIT C
PROVISIONS FOR ERISA INVESTORS
Provided by Manager upon request.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 24
EXHIBIT D
USA PATRIOT ACT COMPLIANCE
1. Name of the bank from which the Subscriber’s payment to the Partnership is being
wired (the “Wiring Bank”):
___________________________________
___________________________________
___________________________________
___________________________________
2. Is the Wiring Bank located in the United States or another “FATF Country”6
?
☐ Yes ☐ No
3. If the Subscriber answered “Yes,” is the Subscriber a customer of the Wiring Bank?
☐ Yes ☐ No
If the Subscriber answered “No” to questions 2 or 3 above, the Subscriber may be required, if the
Subscriber is an individual, to produce a copy of a passport or identification card, together with any
evidence of the Subscriber’s address, such as a utility bill or bank statement, and date of birth. If the
Subscriber is an entity, the Subscriber may be required to produce a certified copy of the
Subscriber’s certificate of incorporation, articles of association (or the equivalent) or certificate of
formation or limited partnership (or the equivalent), and the names, occupations, dates of birth and
residential and business addresses of all directors.

6 As of the date hereof, countries that are members of the Financial Action Task Force on Money
Laundering (each an “FATF Country”) are: Argentina, Australia, Austria, Belgium, Brazil, Canada, Denmark,
Finland, France, Germany, Greece, Hong Kong, Iceland, Ireland, Italy, Japan, Luxembourg, Mexico, Kingdom of
the Netherlands, New Zealand, Norway, Portugal, Singapore, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, Turkey, United
Kingdom, and the United States. The list of FATF Countries may be expanded to include future FATF members
and FATF compliant countries, as appropriate.
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 25
EXHIBIT E
INVESTMENT MANAGER’S PRIVACY NOTICE
Proprietary and Confidential
EWM AI SPV, LLC-Ser 2-Unicorn Tech Subscription Agreement
page 26
EXHIBIT F
INVESTMENT MANAGER’S FORM ADV BROCHURE PARTS 2A & B
